Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COMMUNITY CRIME AND VIOLENCE PREVENTION ACCOUNT; TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $42,000,000 from the community crime and violence prevention account is transferred to the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2023, chapter 52, article 2, sections 12; and 13, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 25-04545 Laws 2023, chapter 52, article 2, section 12 Sec. 12. new text begin COMMUNITY CRIME AND VIOLENCE PREVENTION ACCOUNT; TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $70,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is transferred from the general fund to the community crime and violence prevention account in the special revenue fund. new text end Laws 2023, chapter 52, article 2, section 13 Sec. 13. new text begin COMMUNITY CRIME AND VIOLENCE PREVENTION GRANTS; SPECIAL REVENUE ACCOUNT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin The community crime and violence prevention account is created in the special revenue fund consisting of money deposited, donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. Of the amount in the account, up to $14,000,000 each year is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety for purposes specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.296. new text end